Colorado statutes. TITLE 17 Corrections
ARTICLE 30
INTERDEPARTMENTAL COOPERATION CONCERNING OFFENDERS

17-30-101. Interdepartmental cooperation concerning offenders. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 978, § 1, effective May 8.

L. 95:

(1) repealed, p. 1098, § 19, effective May 31.

L. 99:

(2) repealed, p. 623, § 19, effective August 4.